Rhode Island, session 2025, SB635.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-33.2. Duty to report - Cardiac emergency reporting.
(a) Any person who is an employee, agent, contractor, or volunteer of an educational
program as defined in § 40-11-2, shall immediately notify the principal, headmaster, executive
director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or their designated agent, if that
person called emergency services in response to a child whom under the care and custody of the
educational program suffered a cardiac emergency. The principal, headmaster, executive director,
or other person in charge of the educational program, or their designated agent, shall be responsible
for all subsequent notification to the department of education within twenty-four (24) hours, or its
agent in the manner required by this section. In the case of a public educational program, the
principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge of the educational program, or
their designated agent, shall also notify the superintendent of the public educational program.
Nothing in this section is intended to require more than one report from any educational program
for a specific emergency.
(b) In order to provide guidance and consistency in reporting, the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education shall promulgate policies and procedures for the creation and
handling of reports made by the principal, headmaster, executive director, or other person in charge
of the educational program, or their designated agent in order to carry out the intent of this section.

(c)The department of education shall compile the data from the reports in a summary
report. The annual summary report shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the president of the senate.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002181
========
LC002181 - Page 2 of 3